Hawaii, session 2026, SB147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that unit owners, tenants, and others who use condominium property are subject to chapter 514B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and to the declaration and bylaws of the association pursuant to section 514B-112(a), Hawaii Revised Statutes.  Further, persons shall comply strictly with the covenants, conditions, and restrictions set forth in the declaration, bylaws, and house rules pursuant to section 514B-112(c), Hawaii Revised Statutes.  The legislature intends that condominium associations have adequate remedies to enforce compliance and that persons subject to enforcement actions receive due process.  The remedies prescribed in this Act are intended to ensure due process relating to the imposition of fines and to clarify procedures for disputing other assessments. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish processes and requirements for associations to impose fines against unit owners, tenants, and guests who use condominium property for violations of the declaration, bylaws, or house rules, and to prohibit associations from charging attorneys' fees with respect to any fines that are not deemed collectable. SECTION 2.  Chapter 514B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part VI to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§514B-    Fines.  (a)  An association may impose a fine for the violation of the declaration, bylaws, or house rules adopted pursuant to this chapter; provided that the amount of the fine shall be reasonable. (b)  Notice of the imposition of the fine shall include: (1)  A general description of the act or omission for which the fine is imposed; (2)  Reference to one or more provisions of the declaration, bylaws, or house rules violated by the act or omission; and (3)  Notice of an appeal procedure that provides an aggrieved person a reasonable opportunity to challenge the fine and be heard by the board; provided that an appeal shall be initiated within thirty days after receipt of the notice. (c) Subject to its jurisdictional limits, the small claims division of the district court in the circuit where the condominium is located may finally determine the validity and the amount of a fine imposed pursuant to this section; provided that the right to file a claim pursuant to this subsection shall not accrue until the board submits a notice of its final disposition of any properly initiated appeal; provided further that any complaint brought pursuant to this subsection shall be filed within thirty days after receipt of the board's notice of its final disposition of the appeal. (d)  A fine shall be deemed collectable if: (1)  The time to initiate an appeal has expired and an appeal has not been initiated; (2)  The fine has been upheld following a timely appeal and a small claims court case has not been initiated; and (3)  Small claims court has not invalidated the fine within ninety days after timely initiation of a small claims court case. (e)  Notwithstanding section 514B-157, no attorneys' fees shall be charged by an association against any unit owner or tenant, with respect to a fine, before the fine is deemed collectable. (f)  The imposition of a fine, and the determination of a small claims court, if any, shall be without prejudice to the exercise of any other remedy available to an association under this chapter." SECTION 3.  Section 514B-104, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  Except as provided in section 514B‑105, and subject to the provisions of the declaration and bylaws, the association, even if unincorporated, may: (1)  Adopt and amend the declaration, bylaws, and rules and regulations; (2)  Adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures, and reserves and collect assessments for common expenses from unit owners, subject to section 514B‑148; (3)  Hire and discharge managing agents and other independent contractors, agents, and employees; (4)  Institute, defend, or intervene in litigation or administrative proceedings in its own name on behalf of itself or two or more unit owners on matters affecting the condominium.  For the purposes of actions under chapter 480, associations shall be deemed to be "consumers"; (5)  Make contracts and incur liabilities; (6)  Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement, and modification of common elements; (7)  Cause additional improvements to be made as a part of the common elements; (8)  Acquire, hold, encumber, and convey in its own name any right, title, or interest to real or personal property; provided that: (A)  Designation of additional areas to be common elements or subject to common expenses after the initial filing of the declaration or bylaws shall require the approval of at least sixty-seven per cent of the unit owners; (B)  If the developer discloses to the initial buyer in writing that additional areas will be designated as common elements whether pursuant to an incremental or phased project or otherwise, the requirements of this paragraph shall not apply as to those additional areas; and (C)  The requirements of this paragraph shall not apply to the purchase of a unit for a resident manager, which may be purchased with the approval of the board; (9)  Subject to section 514B‑38, grant easements, leases, licenses, and concessions through or over the common elements and permit encroachments on the common elements; (10)  Impose and receive any payments, fees, or charges for the use, rental, or operation of the common elements, other than limited common elements described in section 514B‑35(2) and (4), and for services provided to unit owners; (11)  Impose charges and penalties, including late fees and interest, for late payment of assessments and levy reasonable fines for violations of the declaration, bylaws, rules, and regulations of the association, [either in accordance with the bylaws or, if the bylaws are silent, pursuant to a resolution adopted by the board that establishes a fining procedure that states the basis for the fine and allows an appeal to the board of the fine with notice and an opportunity to be heard and providing that if the fine is paid, the unit owner shall have the right to initiate a dispute resolution process as provided by sections 514B-161, 514B-162, or by filing a request for an administrative hearing under a pilot program administered by the department of commerce and consumer affairs;] in accordance with section 514B-  ; (12)  Impose reasonable charges for the preparation and recordation of amendments to the declaration, documents requested for resale of units, or statements of unpaid assessments; (13)  Provide for cumulative voting through a provision in the bylaws; (14)  Provide for the indemnification of its officers, board, committee members, and agents, and maintain directors' and officers' liability insurance; (15)  Assign its right to future income, including the right to receive common expense assessments, but only to the extent section 514B‑105(e) expressly so provides; (16)  Exercise any other powers conferred by the declaration or bylaws; (17)  Exercise all other powers that may be exercised in this State by legal entities of the same type as the association, except to the extent inconsistent with this chapter; (18)  Exercise any other powers necessary and proper for the governance and operation of the association; and (19)  By regulation, subject to sections 514B‑146, 514B‑161, and 514B‑162, require that disputes between the board and unit owners or between two or more unit owners regarding the condominium be submitted to nonbinding alternative dispute resolution in the manner described in the regulation as a prerequisite to commencement of a judicial proceeding." SECTION 4.  Section 514B-105, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c)  Any payments made by or on behalf of a unit owner shall first be applied to outstanding common expenses that are assessed to all unit owners in proportion to the common interest appurtenant to their respective units, including commercial property assessed financing assessment expenses incurred for improvements financed pursuant to section 196-64.5.  Only after the outstanding common expenses have been paid in full may the payments be applied to other charges owed to the association, including assessed charges to the unit such as ground lease rent, utility sub-metering, storage lockers, parking stalls, boat slips, insurance deductibles, and cable.  After these charges are paid, other charges, including unpaid late fees, legal fees, collectable fines, and interest, may be assessed in accordance with an application of payment policy adopted by the board; provided that if a unit owner has designated that any payment is for a specific charge that is not a common expense as described in this subsection, the payment may be applied in accordance with the unit owner's designation even if common expenses remain outstanding." SECTION 5.  Section 514B-146, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§514B-146  Association fiscal matters; lien for assessments.  (a) All sums assessed by the association but unpaid for the share of the common expenses chargeable to any unit shall constitute a lien on the unit with priority over all other liens, except: (1)  Liens for real property taxes and assessments lawfully imposed by governmental authority against the unit; and (2)  Except as provided in subsection (j), all sums unpaid on any mortgage of record that was recorded before the recordation of a notice of a lien by the association, and costs and expenses including attorneys' fees provided in the mortgages; provided that a lien recorded by an association for unpaid assessments shall expire six years from the date of recordation unless proceedings to enforce the lien are instituted before the expiration of the lien; provided further that the expiration of a recorded lien shall in no way affect the association's automatic lien that arises pursuant to this subsection or the declaration or bylaws. Any proceedings to enforce an association's lien for any assessment shall be instituted within six years after the assessment became due; provided that if the owner of a unit subject to a lien of the association files a petition for relief under the United States Bankruptcy Code (11 U.S.C. §101 et seq.), the period of time for instituting proceedings to enforce the association's lien shall be tolled until thirty days after the automatic stay of proceedings under section 362 of the United States Bankruptcy Code (11 U.S.C. §362) is lifted. The lien of the association may be foreclosed by action or by nonjudicial or power of sale foreclosure, regardless of the presence or absence of power of sale language in an association's governing documents, by the managing agent or board, acting on behalf of the association and in the name of the association; provided that no association may exercise the nonjudicial or power of sale remedies provided in chapter 667 to foreclose a lien against any unit that arises solely from fines, penalties, legal fees, or late fees, and the foreclosure of the lien shall be filed in court pursuant to part IA of chapter 667. In any foreclosure described in this section, the unit owner shall be required to pay a reasonable rent for the unit, if so provided in the bylaws or the law, and the plaintiff in the foreclosure shall be entitled to the appointment of a receiver to collect the rent owed by the unit owner or any tenant of the unit.  If the association is the plaintiff, it may request that its managing agent be appointed as receiver to collect the rent from the tenant.  The managing agent or board, acting on behalf of the association and in the name of the association, unless prohibited by the declaration, may bid on the unit at foreclosure sale, and acquire and hold, lease, mortgage, and convey the unit.  Action to recover a money judgment for unpaid common expenses shall be maintainable without foreclosing or waiving the lien securing the unpaid common expenses owed. (b)  Except as provided in subsection (j), when the mortgagee of a mortgage of record or other purchaser of a unit obtains title to the unit as a result of foreclosure of the mortgage, the acquirer of title and the acquirer's successors and assigns shall not be liable for the share of the common expenses or assessments by the association chargeable to the unit that became due [prior to] before the acquisition of title to the unit by the acquirer.  The unpaid share of common expenses or assessments shall be deemed to be common expenses collectible from all of the unit owners, including the acquirer and the acquirer's successors and assigns. The mortgagee of record or other purchaser of the unit shall be deemed to acquire title and shall be required to pay the unit's share of common expenses and assessments beginning: (1)  Thirty-six days after the order confirming the sale to the purchaser has been filed with the court; (2)  Sixty days after the hearing at which the court grants the motion to confirm the sale to the purchaser; (3)  Thirty days after the public sale in a nonjudicial power of sale foreclosure conducted pursuant to chapter 667; or (4)  Upon the recording of the instrument of conveyance[;], whichever occurs first; provided that the mortgagee of record or other purchaser of the unit shall not be deemed to acquire title under paragraph (1), (2), or (3), if transfer of title is delayed past the thirty-six days specified in paragraph (1), the sixty days specified in paragraph (2), or the thirty days specified in paragraph (3), when a person who appears at the hearing on the motion or a party to the foreclosure action requests reconsideration of the motion or order to confirm sale, objects to the form of the proposed order to confirm sale, appeals the decision of the court to grant the motion to confirm sale, or the debtor or mortgagor declares bankruptcy or is involuntarily placed into bankruptcy.  In any [such] case, the mortgagee of record or other purchaser of the unit shall be deemed to acquire title upon recordation of the instrument of conveyance. [(c)  A unit owner who receives a demand for payment from an association and disputes the amount of an assessment may request a written statement clearly indicating: (1)  The amount of common expenses included in the assessment, including the due date of each amount claimed; (2)  The amount of any penalty or fine, late fee, lien filing fee, and any other charge included in the assessment that is not imposed on all unit owners as a common expense; and (3)  The amount of attorneys' fees and costs, if any, included in the assessment. (d)  A unit owner who disputes the information in the written statement received from the association pursuant to subsection (c) may request a subsequent written statement that additionally informs the unit owner that: (1)  Under Hawaii law, a unit owner has no right to withhold common expense assessments for any reason; (2)  A unit owner has a right to demand mediation or arbitration to resolve disputes about the amount or validity of an association's common expense assessment; provided that the unit owner immediately pays the common expense assessment in full and keeps common expense assessments current; (3)  Payment in full of the common expense assessment shall not prevent the owner from contesting the common expense assessment or receiving a refund of amounts not owed; and (4)  If the unit owner contests any penalty or fine, late fee, lien filing fee, or other charges included in the assessment, except common expense assessments, the unit owner may demand mediation as provided in subsection (g) prior to paying those charges. (e)  No unit owner shall withhold any common expense assessment claimed by the association.  Nothing in this section shall limit the rights of an owner to the protection of all fair debt collection procedures mandated under federal and state law. (f)  A unit owner who pays an association the full amount of the common expenses claimed by the association may file in small claims court or require the association to mediate to resolve any disputes concerning the amount or validity of the association's common expense claim.  If the unit owner and the association are unable to resolve the dispute through mediation, either party may file for arbitration under section 514B-162; provided that a unit owner may only file for arbitration if all amounts claimed by the association as common expenses are paid in full on or before the date of filing.  If the unit owner fails to keep all association common expense assessments current during the arbitration, the association may ask the arbitrator to temporarily suspend the arbitration proceedings.  If the unit owner pays all association common expense assessments within thirty days of the date of suspension, the unit owner may ask the arbitrator to recommence the arbitration proceedings.  If the unit owner fails to pay all association common expense assessments by the end of the thirty-day period, the association may ask the arbitrator to dismiss the arbitration proceedings.  The unit owner shall be entitled to a refund of any amounts paid as common expenses to the association that are not owed. (g)  A unit owner who contests the amount of any attorneys' fees and costs, penalties or fines, late fees, lien filing fees, or any other charges, except common expense assessments, may make a demand in writing for mediation on the validity of those charges.  The unit owner has thirty days from the date of the written statement requested pursuant to subsection (d) to file demand for mediation on the disputed charges, other than common expense assessments.  If the unit owner fails to file for mediation within thirty days of the date of the written statement requested pursuant to subsection (d), the association may proceed with collection of the charges. If the unit owner makes a request for mediation within thirty days, the association shall be prohibited from attempting to collect any of the disputed charges until the association has participated in the mediation.  The mediation shall be completed within sixty days of the unit owner's request for mediation; provided that if the mediation is not completed within sixty days or the parties are unable to resolve the dispute by mediation, the association may proceed with collection of all amounts due from the unit owner for attorneys' fees and costs, penalties or fines, late fees, lien filing fees, or any other charge that is not imposed on all unit owners as a common expense.] (c)  A unit owner shall have no right to withhold common expense assessments for any reason; provided that a unit owner may dispute the obligation to pay a common expense assessment after payment in full of the assessment. (d)  A unit owner may dispute other assessments, apart from common expense assessments, before making payment.  A unit owner who disputes an assessment, other than a common expense assessment, may request a written statement clearly detailing: (1)  The common expenses included in an assessment, and stating the due date of each amount of common expense assessed; (2)  The amount of any charge included in the assessment that is not imposed on all unit owners as a common expense, including a fine or penalty, a late fee, or a filing fee; and (3)  The amount of attorneys' fees and costs, if any, included in the assessment. In responding to the request, the association shall include a disclaimer that, under state law, a unit owner has no right to withhold common expense assessments for any reason, but that the obligation to pay a common expense assessment may be disputed after the assessment is paid in full.  The association shall also include in the disclaimer that a unit owner may dispute other assessments, apart from a common expense assessment, before making payment, and that the rights to contest assessments are as described in this section and the rights to contest certain fines are described in section 514B-  . (e)  Nothing in this section shall limit the rights of an owner to the protection of all fair debt collection procedures mandated under federal and state law. (f)  A unit owner may file an action in any court with jurisdiction, or may request mediation, to contest: (1)  A paid assessment; or (2)  An unpaid assessment other than a common expense assessment or a fine.  Fines shall be subject to section 514B-  . A unit owner who elects to request mediation shall do so within thirty days after the date of the statement described in subsection (d).  A timely demand for mediation shall stay an association's effort to collect the contested assessment for sixty days; provided that the stay shall not apply to an association's right to record a lien to preserve its priority of the lien. The unit owner shall be entitled to a refund of any amounts paid that are determined to have not been owed. (g)  An association may defend an assessment in court and in mediation. The association may proceed to collect an unpaid assessment by any legal means, except when collection efforts are stayed pursuant to subsection (f). (h)  In conjunction with or as an alternative to foreclosure proceedings under subsection (a), where a unit is owner-occupied, the association may authorize its managing agent or board to, after sixty days' written notice to the unit owner and to the unit's first mortgagee of the nonpayment of the unit's share of the common expenses, terminate the delinquent unit's access to the common elements and cease supplying a delinquent unit with any and all services normally supplied or paid for by the association.  Any terminated services and privileges shall be restored upon payment of all delinquent assessments but need not be restored until payment in full is received. (i)  Before the board or managing agent may take the actions permitted under subsection (h), the board shall adopt a written policy providing for [such] the actions and have the policy approved by a majority vote of the unit owners at an annual or special meeting of the association or by the written consent of a majority of the unit owners. (j)  Subject to this subsection, and subsections (k) and (l), the board may specially assess the amount of the unpaid regular monthly common assessments for common expenses against a mortgagee or other purchaser who, in a judicial or nonjudicial power of sale foreclosure, purchases a delinquent unit; provided that the mortgagee or other purchaser may require the association to provide at no charge a notice of the association's intent to claim lien against the delinquent unit for the amount of the special assessment, [prior to] before the subsequent purchaser's acquisition of title to the delinquent unit.  The notice shall state the amount of the special assessment, how that amount was calculated, and the legal description of the unit. (k)  The amount of the special assessment assessed under subsection (j) shall not exceed the total amount of unpaid regular monthly common assessments that were assessed during the six months immediately preceding the completion of the judicial or nonjudicial power of sale foreclosure. (l)  For the purposes of subsections (j) and (k), the following definitions shall apply, unless the context requires otherwise: "Completion" means: (1)  In a nonjudicial power of sale foreclosure, when the affidavit after public sale is recorded pursuant to section 667-33; and (2)  In a judicial foreclosure, when a purchaser is deemed to acquire title pursuant to subsection (b). "Regular monthly common assessments" does not include: (1)  Any other special assessment, except for a special assessment imposed on all units as part of a budget adopted pursuant to section 514B-148, including commercial property assessed financing assessments imposed pursuant to section 196-64.5; (2)  Late charges, fines, or penalties; (3)  Interest assessed by the association; (4)  Any lien arising out of the assessment; or (5)  Any fees or costs related to the collection or enforcement of the assessment, including attorneys' fees and court costs. (m)  The cost of a release of any lien filed pursuant to this section shall be paid by the party requesting the release. (n)  After any judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure proceeding in which the association acquires title to the unit, any excess rental income received by the association from the unit shall be paid to existing lien holders based on the priority of lien, and not on a pro rata basis, and shall be applied to the benefit of the unit owner.  For purposes of this subsection, excess rental income shall be any net income received by the association after a court has issued a final judgment determining the priority of a senior mortgagee and after paying, crediting, or reimbursing the association or a third party for: (1)  The lien for delinquent assessments pursuant to subsections (a) and (b); (2)  Any maintenance fee delinquency against the unit; (3)  Attorney's fees and other collection costs related to the association's foreclosure of the unit; or (4)  Any costs incurred by the association for the rental, repair, maintenance, or rehabilitation of the unit while the association is in possession of the unit including monthly association maintenance fees, management fees, real estate commissions, cleaning and repair expenses for the unit, and general excise taxes paid on rental income; provided that the lien for delinquent assessments under paragraph (1) shall be paid, credited, or reimbursed first." SECTION 6.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.